Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 10 School Lunch Program

§§ 21-10-101 through 21-10-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections derived from Laws 1947, ch. 142, §§ 1 through 6, and Laws 1951, ch. 64, §§ 1 through 3.

§ 21-10-108.
The school protein enhancement project.

The school protein enhancement project is created. Under the project and for the 2021-2022 school year and thereafter, the department of education may provide financial assistance to school districts to increase the quantity of Wyoming poultry, lamb, pork, beef and bison used in school meals. Financial assistance shall be provided only to pay for processing costs for Wyoming poultry, lamb, pork, beef or bison donated to a school district. The project shall meet program requirements and criteria established by rule and regulation of the department. The department shall, contingent upon available funding, provide a match of at least one dollar ($1.00) for every one dollar ($1.00) contributed by school districts to pay for Wyoming poultry, lamb, pork, beef or bison processing costs. The department may accept any gifts, contributions, donations, grants or federal funds specifically given to the department to support the school protein enhancement project. The department shall, to the extent possible, maintain the structure and requirements of the school protein enhancement pilot project for public school children as created by 2017 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 137. The department shall also endeavor to provide funding to as many school districts as possible.

Each school district may apply to the department of education for financial assistance under this section. Application shall be on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. At a minimum, the application shall include a description of the district’s goals for increasing the quantity of Wyoming poultry, lamb, pork, beef or bison used in school lunches.

History.

2021 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 74, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.